Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1565.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1)(a) The legislature recognizes the significant benefits of dual enrollment programs like running start, which allow high school students to earn college and high school credit simultaneously. A 2024 research brief from the education research and data center highlights that students who participate in running start complete associate and bachelor's degrees faster and with fewer average credits compared to the statewide average and other dual credit programs.(b) The legislature acknowledges that, while running start allows 11th and 12th graders the opportunity to attend in-person and online classes at community colleges and some universities without the burden of tuition costs, expenses such as textbooks, transportation, and class materials continue to create barriers to program participation.(2) The legislature recognizes that it created the Washington dual enrollment scholarship pilot program in 2019 to remove financial barriers for running start students at 13 pilot sites. In accordance with the sunset act, the joint legislative audit and review committee reviewed the program and made the following recommendations: (a) The legislature should continue the dual enrollment scholarship; and (b) the program administrator, the Washington student achievement council, should provide consistent and documented guidance and technical assistance to pilot sites and improve its oversight. The legislature admits that the program ends in 2025 unless reauthorized.(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to: (a) Continue the dual enrollment scholarship program and make it available to all running start students; (b) direct the Washington student achievement council to both adopt rules to implement the program and to develop guidance and technical assistance for the program; and (c) expand the uses of the scholarship award.Sec. 2. RCW 28B.76.730 and 2023 c 314 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The legislature recognizes that dual credit programs reduce both the cost and time of attendance to obtain a postsecondary degree. The legislature intends to reduce barriers and increase access to postsecondary educational opportunities for low-income students by removing the financial barriers for dual enrollment programs for students.(2) The office, in consultation with the participating institutions of higher education and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall ((create))establish and administer the Washington dual enrollment scholarship ((pilot)) program. ((The office shall administer the Washington dual enrollment scholarship pilot program and may adopt rules as necessary.))(3) Eligible students are those who meet the following requirements:(a) Qualify for the free or reduced-price lunch program, food benefits under Title 74 RCW, the college bound scholarship, or the Washington college grant. Eligibility for these programs must be established through attestation or other means established by the office; and(b) ((Are enrolled in one or more dual credit programs, as defined in RCW 28B.15.821, such as running start; and(c) Have at least a 2.0 grade point average))Are enrolled in the running start program as defined in RCW 28A.600.300.(4) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, ((beginning with the 2019-20 academic year,)) the office ((may))shall award scholarships to eligible students. The scholarship award must be as follows for eligible students enrolled in running start:(a) Mandatory fees, as defined in RCW 28A.600.310(((2)))(7), prorated based on credit load;(b) Course fees or laboratory fees as determined appropriate by college or university policies to pay for specified course related costs;(c) A ((textbook)) voucher for required course books, materials, and supplies to be used at the participating institution of higher education's bookstore ((where the student is enrolled. For every credit per quarter the student is enrolled, the student shall receive a textbook voucher for ten dollars, up to a maximum of fifteen credits per quarter, or the equivalent, per year; and(d) Apprenticeship)). The amount of the voucher must be determined by the office, in consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges and participating four-year institutions of higher education, based on the cost of course books, materials, and supplies and the total level of funding requests;(d) Professional technical program, preapprenticeship program, or apprenticeship program materials as determined appropriate by the college or university to pay for specific course-related material costs, which may include occupation-specific tools, work clothes, rain gear, or boots; and(e) If sufficient funding is available after the costs in (a) through (d) of this subsection are covered, a basic needs stipend for food and transportation. The amount of the stipend must be determined by the office, in consultation with the state board for community and technical colleges and participating four-year institutions of higher education. The participating institution of higher education must report to the office the basic needs category for which the stipend was used.(5) The Washington dual enrollment scholarship ((pilot)) program must apply after the fee waivers for low-income students under RCW 28A.600.310 are provided for.(6)(a) By January 1, 2026, the office shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW to implement the Washington dual enrollment scholarship program. At a minimum, the rules must include requirements for grade point average, income eligibility, and allowed costs and expenses.(b) To support scholarship utilization, cost and expense invoicing, and implementation of the rules, the office shall develop and periodically update guidance and other technical assistance, which must be made available to the participating institutions of higher education.(7) Each participating institution of higher education must provide eligible students with access to the maximum scholarship awards by accurately tracking costs and expenses, adhering to program rules, following established guidelines, and making use of available technical assistance.(8) Annually by October 30th, and in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, the office shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with a summary of the amounts and purposes, including basic needs category, for which scholarships were awarded under subsection (4) of this section.(9) As used in this section, "participating institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.600.300.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. The sum of $750,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and $750,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, from the general fund to the office of student financial assistance provided solely for the Washington dual enrollment scholarship.Sec. 4. RCW 43.131.427 and 2019 c 176 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:The Washington dual enrollment scholarship pilot program is terminated July 1, ((2025))2032, as provided in RCW 43.131.428.Sec. 5. RCW 43.131.428 and 2019 c 176 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective July 1, ((2026))2033:RCW 28B.76.730 and 2025 c ... s 2 (section 2 of this act), 2023 c 314 s 3, 2021 c 71 s 6, 2020 c 259 s 1, & 2019 c 176 s 1.--- END ---